Hawaii statutes.
§291C-132 Littering from vehicles.
(a) No person shall throw, place, or drop litter from a vehicle on any
highway. The driver of the vehicle may be cited for any litter thrown, placed,
or dropped from the vehicle.

(b) "Litter" means rubbish, refuse,
waste material, garbage, trash, offal, or debris of whatever kind or
description, whether or not it is of value, and includes improperly discarded
paper, metal, plastic, glass, or solid waste.

(c) The court shall sentence any person
convicted of the offense of littering from vehicles as follows:

(1) For the first offense, defendant shall spend four
hours of either picking up litter on public property or performing community
service.

(2) For any subsequent offense, defendant shall spend
eight hours of either picking up litter on public property or performing
community service.

(d) The court shall fine the person convicted
of committing the offense of littering at least $100, but not more than $500.
[L 1977, c 206, §1; am L 1979, c 60, §6; am L 1992, c 116, §1; am L 2006, c
158, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next